Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2207.26
Credential holder, defined.

Credential holder means (1) any person who holds a valid credential as a trainee real property appraiser, licensed real property appraiser, certified residential real property appraiser, or certified general real property appraiser and (2) any person who holds a temporary credential to engage in real property appraisal practice within this state.

Laws 2015, LB139, § 18;

R.S.Supp.,2016, § 76-2207.10;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 15;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 59.